apertium-niv.niv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<adv%> ! Adverb
%<cnjadv%> ! Conjunctive adverb
%<prn%> ! Pronoun
%<num%> ! Numeral
!%<enc%> ! Enclitic
%<det%> ! Determiner
%<part%> ! Particle
%<ij%> ! Interjection

! Case categories
%<nom%> ! Nominative
%<age%> ! Agentive
%<dat%> ! Dative
%<ins%> ! Instrumental
%<loc%> ! Locative
%<abl%> ! Ablative
%<term%> ! Terminative
%<comp%> ! Comparative
%<voc%> ! Vocative

! Pronoun categories
%<pers%> ! Personal
%<dem%> ! Demonstrative
%<indef%> ! Indefinite
%<itg%> ! Interrogative
%<ref%> ! Reflexive

! Person categories
%<p1%> ! First person
%<p2%> ! Second person
%<p3%> ! Third person

! Number categories
%<sg%> ! Singular
%<du%> ! Dual
%<pl%> ! Plural

! Clusivity categories
%<incl%> ! Inclusive
%<excl%> ! Exclusive

! Verb categories
%<tv%> ! Transitive verb
%<iv%> ! Intransitive verb

! Verb forms
%<inf%> ! infinitive
%<cvb_nar1%> ! narrative converb (null suffix)
%<cvb_nar2%> ! narrative converb (-data/-durngu)
%<cvb_ant%> ! anterior/simultaneous converb
%<cvb_cond%> ! conditional converb ("if")
%<nmz_pred%> ! Predicate-actant nominalisation
%<nmz_subj%> ! Subject nominalisation
%<nmz_loc%> ! Locative nominalisation
%<nmz_adv%> ! Adverbial nominalisation
%<perm%> ! permanent property (for certain attributive verbs)

! Mood categories (for now)
%<ind%> ! Indicative
%<pot%> ! Potential
! %<imp%> ! Imperative
%<itg%> ! Interrogative
%<itg_pej%> ! pejorative interrogative

! Evidentiality / stuff
! may matter later

! Tense categories
%<fut%> ! Future

! Noun categories
%<np%> Proper noun

! Numeral classes
%<cl1%>
%<cl2%>
%<cl3%>
%<cl4%>
%<cl5%>
%<cl6%>
%<cl7%>
%<cl8%>
%<cl9%>

! Formality categories
%<frm%> ! Formal
%<infrm%> ! Informal

! Noun Attribute
%<attr%> ! Noun attribute

! Other symbols
! %<redup%> ! Reduplication
%<qst%>
%<foc%>
%<emph%>
%<poss%>
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%{х%}     ! Cyrillic
%{I%}     ! in some numeral
!%ʼ
%{ʼ%}
%{и%}

%{д%}     ! undergo voicing
%{ф%}

%{a%}     ! delete sometimes
%{o%}
%{u%}
%{y%}
%{j%}
%{f%}
%{ь%}

%{T%}     ! (Latin)
%{X%}     ! (Latin)
%{V%}
%{Q%}
%{R%}
%{B%}
%{G%}
%{Г%}
%{v%}
%{n%}

! Punctuation tags
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

%[Verb%]      ! verb for twoc
%[Noun%]      ! noun for twoc


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
ProperNounRoot ;
PronounRoot ;
DeterminerRoot ;
NumeralRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
AdverbRoot ;
ParticleRoot ;
InterjRoot ;
Punctuation ;

LEXICON CLITICS

%<qst%>:%>ла # ; ! Y/N questions
%<emph%>:%>%{R%}и # ; ! intensifying particle 'even'
%<emph%>:%>ӿагин # ; ! intensifying particle 'even'
%<foc%>:%>%{R%}а # ; ! focus particle
%<foc%>:%>ат # ; ! focus particle
%<part%>:%>ӿайра # ; ! 'probably'
%<itg_pej%>:%>ӿата # ; ! used with an interrogative word, expresses displeasure/disapproval

# ;

LEXICON CASES
%<age%>:%>%{a%}ӽ CLITICS ;            ! Agentive
%<dat%>:%>%{R%}%{o%}ӽ CLITICS ;       ! Dative
%<ins%>:%>%{G%}ир CLITICS ;           ! Instrumental
%<loc%>:%>%{u%}%{j%}н CLITICS ;       ! Locative
%<abl%>:%>%{u%}х CLITICS ;            ! Ablative
%<term%>:%>%{T%}%{ʼ%}ыкы CLITICS ;    ! Terminative
%<term%>:%>%{T%}%{ʼ%}%{X%}а CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<term%>:%>%{R%}оӻо CLITICS ;         ! Dir/LR
%<comp%>:%>%{y%}к CLITICS ;           ! Comparative
%<voc%>:%>%{V%} # ;                   ! Vocative
INCORPORATE-N ;                       ! Nominative

LEXICON N-INFL

CASES ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL;
%<pl%>:%>%{G%}у N-INFL ;

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%[Noun%]: # ; ! attributive noun
%<n%>%[Noun%]: SUBST ;

LEXICON PN1
%<np%>: N-INFL ;

LEXICON POSS

%<poss%>:%>ны CASES ;
# ;

LEXICON PRN1

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:и POSS ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%+:ь%> TVerbRoot ;
%<det%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<poss%>%+:ь%> NounRoot ;

LEXICON PRN2

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:и POSS ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%+:ʼ%> TVerbRoot ;
%<det%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<poss%>%+:ʼ%> NounRoot ;

LEXICON PRN3

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: POSS ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%+:%> TVerbRoot ;
%<det%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<poss%>%+:%> NounRoot ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRN4

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<excl%>: POSS ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<excl%>%+:%> TVerbRoot ;
%<det%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<excl%>%<poss%>%+:%> NounRoot ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<excl%>:%> CASES ;

LEXICON PRN5

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<incl%>: POSS ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<incl%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<incl%>:%> CASES ;

LEXICON PRN6

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>: POSS ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>:%> CASES ;

LEXICON PRN7

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: POSS ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%+:%> TVerbRoot ;
%<det%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%+:%> NounRoot ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%> CASES ;

LEXICON PRN8

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: POSS ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%+:%> TVerbRoot ;
%<det%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%+:%> NounRoot ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> CASES ;

LEXICON PRN9

%<prn%>%<ref%>:и POSS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%+:%> TVerbRoot ;
%<det%>%<ref%>%<poss%>%+:%> NounRoot ;

LEXICON IndefinitePRN

%<prn%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<indef%>%+:%> TVerbRoot ; ! Not sure if it can decline to other cases

LEXICON DemonstrativePRN

%<prn%>%<dem%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%+:%> TVerbRoot ;

LEXICON InterrogativePRN
%<prn%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET
%<det%>%<dem%>%+:%> NounRoot ;

LEXICON SubjAgree

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>т # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>р # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>р # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>т # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>т # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>т # ;

LEXICON ADV1

%<adv%>:%>%{Г%}у SubjAgree ;

LEXICON COMP

%<comp%>:%>ё ADV1;
ADV1 ;

LEXICON NUM1

%<num%>%<cl1%>:%>%{I%}н INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl2%>:%>ьын INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl3%>:%>яӄр INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl9%>:%>ик INCORPORATE-N ;
INCORPORATE-N ;

LEXICON NUM2

%<num%>%<cl1%>:%>ен INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl2%>:%>ор INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl3%>:%>еӄр INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl4%>:%>евсӄ INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl5%>:%>им INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl6%>:%>ер INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl7%>:%>евор INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl8%>:%>ерах INCORPORATE-N ;
%<num%>%<cl9%>:%>ик INCORPORATE-N ;
INCORPORATE-N ;

LEXICON PluralVerb
%<pl%>:%>%{G%}у # ;
CLITICS ;
# ;

LEXICON FORMALITY
%<frm%>:о # ;
%<infrm%>: # ;

LEXICON MOOD
%<itg%>:%>л FORMALITY ;
%<ind%>:%>%{д%}ь PluralVerb ;
%<pot%>:%>%{Q%}ана PluralVerb ;
! %<imp%>:%>idk # ;
# ;

INCORPORATE-V ;

LEXICON NonFinite

%<inf%>:%>%{R%}оӽ # ;
%<cvb_nar1%>: SubjAgree ;
%<cvb_nar2%>:%>%{д%}ата SubjAgree ;   ! Dir/LR
%<cvb_nar2%>:%>%{д%}урӈу SubjAgree ;
%<cvb_ant%>:%>ӈан # ;
%<cvb_cond%>:%>ӻа # ;
MOOD ;

LEXICON TENSE

%<fut%>:%>ны NonFinite ;
NonFinite ;

LEXICON TV1
%<v%>%<tv%>%[Verb%]: TENSE;

LEXICON IV1
%<v%>%<iv%>%[Verb%]: TENSE;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<perm%>%[Verb%]:%>ла INCORPORATE-V;

LEXICON INCORPORATE-N
%+:%> NumeralRoot ;
%+: ParticleRoot ;
%+:%>%{v%} TVerbRoot ;
%+:%>%{v%} IVerbRoot ;
%+:%>%{v%} IrregBoundVerbRoot ;
%+:%>%{n%} NounRoot ;
CLITICS ;

LEXICON INCORPORATE-V
%+:%>%{n%} NounRoot ;
%+:%>%{v%} TVerbRoot ;
%+:%>%{v%} IVerbRoot ;
%+:%>%{v%} IrregBoundVerbRoot ;

LEXICON CnjADV
%<cnjadv%>: #;

LEXICON ItgADV
%<adv%>%<itg%>: #;

LEXICON ADV2
%<adv%>: #;

LEXICON INTERJ
%<ij%>: #;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot
ытык:ытык N1          ; ! father
ӄан:ӄан N1            ; ! doggo
ӈа:ӈа N1              ; ! animal
тыф:ты%{ф%} N1        ; ! house
ми:ми N1              ; ! inside
нивх:нив%{х%} N1      ; ! person, man
ваӄа:ваӄа N1          ; ! box
сета:сета N1          ; ! sugar
ойдам:ойдам N1        ; ! baby
курӈ:курӈ N1          ; ! universe
тяӄо:ч%{ь%}аӄо N1     ; ! knife
оола:оола N1          ; ! child
чʼатьф:чʼ{ь%}ать%{ф%} N1 ; ! bog, swamp
ыф:ы%{ф%} N1          ; ! beard
арф:ар%{ф%} N1        ; ! side of boat
ӿуньф:ӿунь%{ф%} N1    ; ! barrel
пердь:пердь N1        ; ! burden
ыкын:ыкын N1          ; ! older brother
атик:атик N1          ; ! younger brother
нанак:нанак N1        ; ! older sister
ытик:ытик N1          ; ! grandmother
пос:пос N1            ; ! fabric, cloth
ӈафӄ:ӈафӄ N1          ; ! friend
леп:леп N1            ; ! bread
ларӄ:ларӄ N1          ; ! shirt
кинс:кинс N1          ; ! devil
во:во N1              ; ! village
кʼеӄ:к%{ʼ%}еӄ N1      ; ! fox
чеврӄ:ч{ь%}еврӄ N1    ; ! bird
тупр̌:тупр̌ N1          ; ! feather
тюс:тюс N1            ; ! meat
мулк:мулк N1          ; ! basket
ӈояӄ:ӈояӄ N1          ; ! egg
ӄʼас:ӄ%{ʼ%}ас N1      ; ! tambourine
выйбукс:выйбукс N1    ; ! tie
мифпʼидь:мифпʼидь N1  ; ! toad
ӄʼос:ӄ%{ʼ%}ос N1      ; ! neck
олғоӈ:олғоӈ N1        ; ! pig, hog, swine
коӽ:коӽ N1            ; ! belly
пыньх:пыньх N1        ; ! soup
нё:нё N1              ; ! barn
ӿеӄрӈа:ӿеӄрӈа N1      ; ! place further from shore (than here)
лумр:лумр N1          ; ! sable
ӿонтӄ:ӿонтӄ N1        ; ! sack
ӿемар:ӿемар N1        ; ! old man
паӽ:паӽ N1            ; ! stone, rock
толф:тол%{ф%} N1      ; ! summer
ма:ма N1              ; ! dried fish
питғы:питғы N1        ; ! paper (written), book
пон:пон N1            ; ! villager
кʼеӈ:к%{ʼ%}еӈ N1      ; ! sun
ӈыньк:ӈыньк N1	      ; ! face
ӈайн:ӈайн N1	        ; ! cheek
т’ыр:т%{’%}ыр N1      ; ! left (not right)
ӈир:ӈир N1	          ; ! right (not left)
ӈамадь:ӈамадь N1      ; ! skin
няӽ:няӽ N1	          ; ! eye
них:них N1	          ; ! tear (from the eye)
т’а:т%{ʼ%}а N1	      ; ! pate, crown of head
нос:нос N1	          ; ! ear
мла:мла N1	          ; ! earlobe
вих:вих N1	          ; ! nose
ыӈг:ыӈг N1	          ; ! mouth
эмс:эмс N1	          ; ! molar
ывлх:ывлх N1	        ; ! lip
оӻри:оӻри N1	        ; ! nape, occiput
кʼуты:к%{ʼ%}уты N1    ; ! hole
пʼирӈыр:п%{ʼ%}ирӈыр N1 ; ! sazan (kind of carp)
ыс:ыс N1              ; ! owner
ӿыйк:ӿыйк N1          ; ! hare
топин:топин N1        ; ! jay
мур:мур N1            ; ! horse
чӽа:чӽа N1            ; ! money
ымык:ымык N1          ; ! mother
ӄʼотр:ӄ%{ʼ%}отр N1    ; ! bear
вынь:вынь N1          ; ! kettle
тойғур:тойғур N1      ; ! seal
ыс:ыс N1              ; ! swallow (bird)
кетул:кетул N1        ; ! giraffe
лаӄр:лаӄр N1          ; ! squirrel
меӄ:меӄ N1            ; ! musk deer
лиғзнонӄ:лиғзнонӄ N1  ; ! wolf cub
обезьяна:обезьяна N1  ; ! monkey
чхыф:чхы%{ф%} N1      ; ! bear
тʼоӽ:т%{ʼ%}оӽ N1      ; ! moose
члығи:члығи N1        ; ! lynx
чоӽ:чоӽ N1            ; ! fang, tusk
ӈаӻр:ӈаӻр N1          ; ! skin, coat, pelt
авсӄ:авсӄ N1          ; ! ruff, ruffe (fish)
вағс:вағс N1          ; ! whitefish
визлых:визлых N1      ; ! root
р̌авӈыкс:р̌%{ʼ%}авӈыкс N1 ; ! rhododendron
ӿим:ӿим N1            ; ! Siberian dwarf pine
тэуӈи:тэуӈи N1        ; ! maple (tree)
ӿивс:ӿивс N1          ; ! birch
каӻӈ:каӻӈ N1          ; ! pine
музӈи:музӈи N1        ; ! sedge
мер:мер N1            ; ! pussy willow
вах:вах N1            ; ! moss
ар:ар N1              ; ! male
найӄнонӄ:найӄнонӄ N1  ; ! puppy
архыск:архыск N1      ; ! cat (male)
арэӻа:арэӻа N1        ; ! bull, ox
армур:армур N1        ; ! stallion
мус:мус N1            ; ! oats
чылғи:чылғи N1        ; ! foot
пих:пих N1            ; ! knee
ӈиф:ӈи%{ф%} N1        ; ! heart
кезӈи:кезӈи N1        ; ! gland
ӈызрк:ӈызрк N1        ; ! vein
сусыр:сусыр N1        ; ! spleen
чылу:чылу N1          ; ! fog
члы:члы N1            ; ! sky
орми:орми N1          ; ! clay
эри:эри N1            ; ! river
пал:пал N1            ; ! taiga
ӈыю:ӈыю N1            ; ! ravine
ки:ки N1              ; ! footwear
утку:утку N1          ; ! hubby
